Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1947.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Responsible Budgeting Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Emergency." A sudden, urgent, unforeseen and temporary situation that requires an immediate expenditure of funds to preserve the health, safety and general welfare of the residents of this Commonwealth."Enacted spending." General Fund expenditures that are used as a basis to consider and build support for other funding 123456789101112131415161718 sources to support State government operations."Fund." The Commonwealth Reserve Fund established under section 5."Gross State product." The total economic output of this Commonwealth, which encompasses the final goods and services produced within this Commonwealth, as estimated in the United States Bureau of Economic Analysis."Revenue." Money required by law to be paid to the Commonwealth and collected lawfully by the Commonwealth. The term does not include borrowed funds or receipt of money transferred from the Federal Government."Spending." Money in the State Treasury expended by the Commonwealth. The term does not include the expenditure of money in the State Treasury that was transferred from the Federal Government.Section 3. Limit on fiscal year spending.(a) Calculation.--The limit on fiscal year spending shall equal enacted spending in the prior fiscal year increased by the structural balance factor under subsection (b).(b) Structural balance factor.--The structural balance factor shall be the difference between:(1) the average rate of growth of gross State product during the five calendar years preceding the regular legislative session; and(2) the deficit brake under subsection (c).(c) Deficit brake.--The deficit brake shall:(1) Have an initial and a minimum value of 0.(2) Increase by 0.2 percentage points, cumulatively, for the upcoming fiscal year after a fiscal year when the dollar amount of spending exceeded the dollar amount of revenue.20250HB1947PN2456 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Decrease by 0.2 percentage points, cumulatively, for the upcoming fiscal year after a fiscal year when the dollar amount of spending did not exceed the dollar amount of revenue.(d) Adjustment.--The General Assembly may adjust the limit on fiscal year spending to:(1) reflect enacted changes in the dollar amount of revenue collected; or(2) provide for emergencies under section 4.Section 4. Emergency spending.(a) Authorization.--The General Assembly may authorize spending in excess of the limit on fiscal year spending under section 3 through legislation that includes an emergency declaration describing the situation and which obtains the vote of two-thirds of the members present and voting in the Senate and the House of Representatives.(b) Offset.--Emergency spending shall be offset by equal reductions in the limit on fiscal year spending for each of the subsequent six fiscal years.(c) Effect.--Neither emergency spending nor its subsequent offset shall otherwise affect the basis for calculating subsequent limits on fiscal year spending under section 3.Section 5. Commonwealth Reserve Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Commonwealth Reserve Fund is established in the State Treasury. The money in the fund is appropriated on a continuing basis to the Treasury Department for the purposes provided in subsection (c).(b) Fund sources.--Budget surpluses shall be deposited into the fund. Interest and other earnings on the fund shall accrue to the fund.20250HB1947PN2456 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Spending support.--The fund and current revenue shall support spending within the limit on fiscal year spending established under section 3, including emergency adjustments.(d) Rebates and other uses.--When the fund equals 15% of the current spending limit, at least 50% of further surpluses shall be rebated by the State Treasurer, in consultation with the Department of Revenue, to taxpayers in proportion to taxes paid, and the remainder shall reduce general debt or, as the General Assembly may direct, other liabilities of the Commonwealth. Surplus revenue used for rebates or to reduce Commonwealth liabilities shall be excluded from the limit on fiscal year spending under section 3.Section 6. Automatic spending levels.If the General Assembly does not enact the General Appropriation Act for the upcoming fiscal year by the end of the current fiscal year on June 30, the funding levels under the General Appropriation Act for the immediately prior fiscal year shall take effect beginning July 1 and shall remain in effect until the General Appropriation Act is enacted for the current fiscal year.Section 7. Applicability.This act shall apply to the fiscal year that begins not less than 60 days following the effective date of this section and to each fiscal year thereafter.Section 8. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1947PN2456 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526